Arkansas statutes. Title 28 Wills, Estates, and Fiduciary Relationships
Chapter 65

Guardians Generally

Publisher's Notes. Acts 1985, No. 940, § 1, provided that Acts 1983, No. 345, impliedly repealed several sections of the Arkansas Guardianship Law and provided that, because Acts 1983, No. 345, went beyond the purposes for which it was presented to the General Assembly, it was determined that it would be in the best interests of the people of this state that Acts 1983, No. 345, be repealed and the provisions of the previous guardianship law be, in essence, reenacted, with amendments.

Subchapter 1

— General Provisions

Cross References. Limited relaxation of the prudent man rule for fiduciaries and financial institutions, §28-71-107.

Effective Dates. Acts 1987, No. 16, § 4: Feb. 9, 1987. Emergency clause provided: “It is hereby found and determined by the General Assembly that considerable doubt and confusion has been cast on various guardianships established during the period from the effective date of Act 345 of 1983 until the effective date of Act 940 of 1985 due to the fact that the provisions of Act 345 of 1983 were unclear with respect to the repeal of various other laws relating to guardianships; that it is urgent that such doubt be removed at the earliest possible date in order that guardians appointed during that period can proceed to carry out their official responsibilities and to thereby accomplish the purposes for which the guardianships were established; that this Act is designed to remove this doubt and specifically validate all such guardianships and should be given effect immediately. Therefore, an emergency is hereby declared to exist and this Act being necessary for the preservation of the public peace, health and safety shall be in full force and effect from and after its passage and approval.”

Acts 2007, No. 862, § 5: Apr. 3, 2007, provided: “Contingent effectiveness. This act shall take effect upon the occurrence of the following: (1) The Director of the Division of Aging and Adult Services of the Department of Health and Human Services determines that adequate appropriation, funding, and positions are available to carry out a public guardianship program for adults; and (2) The director appoints an employee of the Division of Aging and Adult Services to serve as Public Guardian for Adults.”

Acts 2011, No. 159, § 1:Jan. 1, 2012.

28-65-101. Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Essential requirements for health or safety” means the health care, food, shelter, clothing, and protection without which serious illness or serious physical injury will occur;

“Evaluation” means a professional assessment of the abilities of the respondent and the impact of any impairments on the individual's capability to meet the essential requirements for his or her health or safety or to manage his or her estate;

“Guardian” means one appointed by a court to have the care and custody of the person or of the estate, or of both, of an incapacitated person;

“Guardian ad litem” means one appointed by a court in which a particular proceeding is pending to represent a ward or an unborn person in that proceeding;

“Incapacitated person” means a person who is impaired by reason of a disability such as mental illness, mental deficiency, physical illness, chronic use of drugs, or chronic intoxication, to the extent of lacking sufficient understanding or capacity to make or communicate decisions to meet the essential requirements for his or her health or safety or to manage his or her estate.

“Incapacitated person” includes an endangered adult or impaired adult as defined in § 9-20-103, who is in the custody of the Department of Human Services.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to mean a person is incapacitated for the sole reason he or she relies consistently on treatment by spiritual means through prayer alone for healing in accordance with his or her religious tradition and is being furnished such treatment;

“Least restrictive alternative” means the form of assistance that least interferes with the legal capacity of the respondent to act in his or her own behalf;

“Limited guardian” means one whose powers and authority have been limited to the specific powers, authorities, and duties set forth in the order of appointment;

“Professional” means a physician, licensed psychologist, or licensed certified social worker with training, experience, and knowledge of the particular alleged disability of the respondent;

“Relative” means the spouse, child, grandchild, parent, grandparent, or sibling of a ward;

“Temporary guardian” means a guardian appointed pursuant to § 28-65-218; and

“Ward” means an incapacitated person for whom a guardian has been appointed.

Amendments. The 2007 amendment inserted (5)(B) and redesignated former (5)(B) as (5)(C).

The 2011 amendment inserted “endangered or” and substituted “§9-20-103” for “§9-20-103(8)(A)” in (5)(B).

The 2017 amendment added the definition for “Relative”.

Ark. L. Rev.

Pecora, The Constitutional Right to Court-Appointed Adversary Counsel for Defendants in Guardianship Proceedings, 43 Ark. L. Rev. 345.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Survey — Probate, 10 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 599.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Matthew L. Brunson, Family Law—Providing for Those Who Cannot Provide for Themselves: A Proposal for the Arkansas General Assembly to Follow in the Footsteps of an Already Expansive Guardianship Law and Grant Guardians the Right to File for Divorce on Behalf of a Ward, 38 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 271 (2016).

On appeal of the order granting a permanent guardianship of appellant's son to his grandmother, the Supreme Court of Arkansas did not address the merits of appellant's constitutional challenge to the guardianship statutes, §§28-65-101 to28-65-707, because the attorney general was not notified of the challenge as required by §16-111-106(b) and there had not been a complete adversarial development of the constitutional issues.Mahavier v. Mahavier (In re A.M.), 2012 Ark. 278 (2012).

Failure to obtain a professional evaluation prior to a hearing on the appointment of a guardian was clearly erroneous; there was no oral testimony or a sworn written statement of a qualified professional. Without the required professional examination, there was insufficient evidence of the need for a guardian.Autry v. Beckham, 2014 Ark. App. 692, 450 S.W.3d 247 (2014).

The definition of an “incompetent” as set out in former statute did not change the test of competency approved by the Supreme Court in many decisions. Powers v. Chisman, 217 Ark. 508, 231 S.W.2d 598 (1950) (decision under prior law).

Trial court did not err in determining that an original guardianship order was simply voidable rather than void ab initio; while the original petition failed to meet the statutory requirements for obtaining a guardianship, such as those in subdivision (8) of this section, the petition's deficiencies did not strip the court of jurisdiction over the parties or the subject matter.Baptist Health Med. Ctr. v. First Cmty. Bank ofBatesville, 2017 Ark. App. 671,537 S.W.3d 760 (2017).

Cited: In re Bailey, 299 Ark. 352, 771 S.W.2d 779 (1989).

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-821; Acts 2007, No. 121, § 1; 2011, No. 1027, § 1; 2017, No. 667, § 4.

28-65-102. Relationship of chapter to Uniform Veterans' Guardianship Act.

The provisions of this chapter shall:

Extend to the persons specifically provided for under the terms of the Uniform Veterans' Guardianship Act, § 28-66-101 et seq; and

Be cumulative to the Uniform Veterans' Guardianship Act, § 28-66-101 et seq.

However, all conflicts arising between the Uniform Veterans' Guardianship Act, § 28-66-101 et seq., and this chapter shall be resolved by giving effect to the law as stated in the Uniform Veterans' Guardianship Act, § 28-66-101 et seq., in cases to which the Uniform Veterans' Guardianship Act, § 28-66-101 et seq., applies and then only as applicable to assets derived through the Veterans' Administration.

In those cases in which no specific rule is provided for guardianships in this chapter, the rule governing decedents' estates in Acts 1949, No. 140, as amended, shall apply to guardianships when applicable thereto and not inconsistent with the provisions of this chapter.

Nothing in this chapter repeals or supersedes §§ 28-71-101 — 28-71-106.

If there is a conflict between this chapter and §§ 28-71-101 — 28-71-106, then the provisions of §§ 28-71-101 — 28-71-106 shall control.

This chapter does not invalidate appointments of guardians heretofore made pursuant to Acts 1983, No. 345 [repealed], but from and after June 28, 1985, this chapter shall apply to all such guardianships.

It is found and determined by the General Assembly that:

Act 345 of 1983 [repealed] governing guardianships for incapacitated persons created considerable confusion concerning various other laws relating to the appointment of guardians;

Part of that confusion was due to uncertainty as to whether Act 345 of 1983 [repealed], was intended to repeal or supersede various other laws relating to guardianship;

As a result of this confusion, guardianships were established by various courts in the state under the provisions of various laws which were in effect concurrently with or immediately prior to Act 345 of 1983 [repealed], and there is now some question concerning the validity of some of those guardianships; and

This confusion and doubt should be removed in order that guardians appointed during that period can continue to carry out their responsibilities without the doubt and disagreement concerning their official capacity and authority.

It is therefore the intent and purpose of this subsection to validate any and all guardianships established from July 4, 1983, until June 28, 1985, under authority of Act 345 of 1983 [repealed] or any law in effect concurrently with or immediately prior to July 4, 1983.

Any guardianship established during the period from July 4, 1983, to June 28, 1985, whether established under Act 345 of 1983 [repealed], or under any act in effect concurrently with Act 345 of 1983 [repealed], or any act in effect immediately prior to July 4, 1983, is declared to be valid and shall continue in effect for the purposes established. However, the provisions of this chapter shall be applicable to all guardianships so established except as otherwise provided in § 28-65-102.

The appropriate jurisdiction for an adult guardianship action, excluding proceedings under the Adult Custody Maltreatment Act, § 9-20-101 et seq., under this chapter that involve a party residing outside the state shall be determined under the Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act, § 28-74-101 et seq.

The appropriate jurisdiction for an adult guardianship action under the Adult Custody Maltreatment Act, § 9-20-101 et seq., that involves a maltreated adult residing outside the state shall be determined under the Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act, § 28-74-101 et seq.

Amendments. The 2011 amendment added (g) and (h).

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Survey — Probate, 10 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 599.

Cited: Smart v. Biggs, 26 Ark. App. 141, 760 S.W.2d 882 (1988).

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 3; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-822.

28-65-103. Applicability of other acts.

The provisions of §§28-1-101 —28-1-104,28-1-106,28-1-108 —28-1-113,28-1-115, and28-1-116, unless therein expressly restricted to decedents' estates, shall apply to guardianships.

When sections in subtitle 4 of this title are incorporated by reference by any sections of this chapter they shall be applied as if “decedent” read “incapacitated person” and “personal representative” read “guardian”. Similarly, other terms applicable to guardianship shall be substituted for terms applicable to decedents' estates.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 4; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-823; Acts 1987, No. 16, §§ 1, 2; 2011, No. 159, § 2.

28-65-104. Incapacitated persons.

For purposes of this chapter, the following persons are incapacitated persons:

Persons under age eighteen (18) whose disabilities have not been removed;

Persons who are detained or confined by a foreign power or who have disappeared; and

Persons under age twenty-one (21) who:

Have reached eighteen (18) years of age;

Have a current guardianship established based solely on the minority age of the person;

Agree to allow the current guardianship to continue up to twenty-one (21) years of age; and

Receive a guardianship subsidy paid for or approved by the Department of Human Services.

Amendments. The 2013 amendment added (3).

Ark. L. Rev.

Leflar, Liberty and Death: Advance Health Care Directives and the Law of Arkansas, 39 Ark. L. Rev. 375.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Legislative Survey, Probate, 8 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 597.

Survey — Probate, 10 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 599.

Minor child fell under the definition of an incapacitated person because she was under the age of majority.Little v. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., 2016 Ark. App. 362, 499 S.W.3d 233 (2016).

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-821; Acts 2013, No. 577, § 2.

28-65-105. Purpose of guardianship.

Guardianship for an incapacitated person shall be:

Used only as is necessary to promote and protect the well-being of the person and his or her property;

Designed to encourage the development of maximum self-reliance and independence of the person; and

Ordered only to the extent necessitated by the person's actual mental, physical, and adoptive limitations.

Ark. L. Rev.

Leflar, Liberty and Death: Advance Health Care Directives and the Law of Arkansas, 39 Ark. L. Rev. 375.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Legislative Survey, Probate, 8 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 597.

Survey — Probate, 10 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 599.

In light of the public policy favoring arbitration and the Legislature's decision to refrain from specifically limiting a guardian's ability to enter into arbitration agreements, a guardian of a patient's person and the patient's estate possessed the authority to enter into an arbitration agreement with a nursing home on behalf of the patient; therefore, the nursing home's motion to compel arbitration should have been granted.GGNSC Holdings, LLC v. Lamb, 2016 Ark. 101, 487 S.W.3d 348 (2016).

Failure to obtain a professional evaluation prior to a hearing on the appointment of a guardian was clearly erroneous; there was no oral testimony or a sworn written statement of a qualified professional. Without the required professional examination, there was insufficient evidence of the need for a guardian.Autry v. Beckham, 2014 Ark. App. 692, 450 S.W.3d 247 (2014).

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-821.

28-65-106. Rights of incapacitated persons.

A ward is not presumed to be incompetent and retains all legal and civil rights except those which have been expressly limited by court order or have been specifically granted by order to the guardian by the court.

A ward retains the right to communicate, visit, or interact with any person of the ward's choice.

If a ward is unable to give express consent to communication, visitation, or interaction with a person due to a physical or mental condition, then the consent of the ward may be presumed by a guardian or a court based on the ward's prior relationship with the person seeking communication, visitation, or interaction with the ward.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment designated the former section as (a); substituted “A ward” for “An incapacitated person for whom a guardian has been appointed” in (a); and added (b).

Ark. L. Rev.

Leflar, Liberty and Death: Advance Health Care Directives and the Law of Arkansas, 39 Ark. L. Rev. 375.

U. Ark. Little Rock L.J.

Legislative Survey, Probate, 8 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 597.

Survey — Probate, 10 U. Ark. Little Rock L.J. 599.

U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev.

Matthew L. Brunson, Family Law—Providing for Those Who Cannot Provide for Themselves: A Proposal for the Arkansas General Assembly to Follow in the Footsteps of an Already Expansive Guardianship Law and Grant Guardians the Right to File for Divorce on Behalf of a Ward, 38 U. Ark. Little Rock L. Rev. 271 (2016).

If a juvenile is the subject matter of an open case filed under the Arkansas Juvenile Code of 1989, § 9-27-301 et seq., the guardianship petition shall be filed in that case if the juvenile resides in Arkansas.

If the juvenile resides out of state through the Interstate Compact on the Placement of Children, § 9-29-201 et seq., the guardianship petition may be filed in Arkansas or it may be filed in the state in which the juvenile resides, subject to approval by the receiving state.

The Department of Human Services may intervene as a matter of right in a guardianship action at any time before the entry of a permanent guardianship order if:

A guardianship action is initiated for a child or adult in the custody of the department, including a seventy-two-hour hold; and

The custody of the child or adult is granted to a party seeking guardianship.

The appropriate jurisdiction for an adult guardianship action, excluding proceedings under the Adult Maltreatment Custody Act, § 9-20-101 et seq., under this chapter that involve a party residing outside the state shall be determined under the Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act, § 28-74-101 et seq.

The appropriate jurisdiction for an adult guardianship action under the Adult Maltreatment Custody Act, § 9-20-101 et seq., that involves a maltreated adult residing outside the state shall be determined under the Uniform Adult Guardianship and Protective Proceedings Jurisdiction Act, § 28-74-101 et seq.

Amendments. The 2009 amendment, in (c), inserted (c)(2), redesignated the remaining text accordingly, and inserted “if the juvenile resides in Arkansas” in (c)(1).

The 2011 amendment added (d) and (e).

The 2013 amendment added (c)(3).

Cross References. Jurisdiction of adoption of minors, §9-9-205.

Former similar statute took jurisdiction for the appointment of guardians from the juvenile court and vested it exclusively in the probate court. Cude v. State, 237 Ark. 927, 377 S.W.2d 816 (1964) (decision under prior law).

Circuit court was vested with jurisdiction to appoint a guardian under subsection (a) of this section; therefore, the circuit court had subject-matter jurisdiction to appoint a guardian for the mother's children. Moore v. Sipes, 85 Ark. App. 15, 146 S.W.3d 903 (2004).

A probate judge was invested with a sound legal discretion in the appointment of guardians, and his judgment would not be overruled except in cases of manifest error or abuse of such discretion. Sadler v. Rose, 18 Ark. 600 (1857) (decision under prior law).

The jurisdiction of a probate court in guardianship matters was limited to guardians and persons of unsound mind and their estates as vested in courts of probate at the time of the adoption of Ark. Const., Amend. 24, Art. 7, § 34, or as thereafter prescribed by law. Keenan v. Peevy, 267 Ark. 218, 590 S.W.2d 259 (1979) (decision under prior law).

A probate court's jurisdiction in guardianship matters was limited to persons of unsound mind; that inability which permitted the appointment of a guardian was limited to some form of mental incapacity. In re Estate of Lemley, 9 Ark. App. 140, 653 S.W.2d 141 (1983) (decision under prior law).

The circuit court's power to review and conclude, subject to appeal, whether the money is “accessible”, under whatever state or federal regulations may apply, does not mean that the circuit court has the authority to determine how a guardian is to use a ward's funds; that decision lies exclusively within the jurisdiction of the probate court according to subsection (a) of this section. Another section, §28-65-310(c)(3), deals with the probate court's authority to invade the principal of a minor ward's estate to provide for support. In re Porter, 298 Ark. 121, 765 S.W.2d 944 (1989) (decision under prior law).

Probate courts are courts of limited and specific jurisdiction, and they have only the powers conferred by the Constitution or by statute or powers necessarily incidental to those specifically granted. Arkansas Dep't of Human Servs. v. Estate of Hogan, 314 Ark. 19, 858 S.W.2d 105 (1993) (decision under prior law).

Subsection (a) of this section and §28-65-317 bring into focus the settled rule that the probate court is a court of special and limited jurisdiction, having only such jurisdiction and powers as are conferred by the constitution or by statute, or necessarily incidental thereto. Arkansas State Employees Ins. Advisory Comm. v. Estate of Manning, 316 Ark. 143, 870 S.W.2d 748 (1994) (decision under prior law).

The probate court had no subject matter jurisdiction to rule on an insurer's subrogation claim. Arkansas State Employees Ins. Advisory Comm. v. Estate of Manning, 316 Ark. 143, 870 S.W.2d 748 (1994) (decision under prior law).

In an accounting action, a probate court did not err in failing to stay the case to allow for the resolution of a circuit court lawsuit alleging breach of fiduciary duties and other torts; a probate court was the appropriate place to proceed with an accounting action.In re Estates of McKnight v. Bank of Am., N.A., 372 Ark. 376, 277 S.W.3d 173 (2008).

Circuit court did not err in allowing two family members to become parties to a dependency-neglect case without first finding that they had met the requirements of Ark. R. Civ. P. 24 given the mandatory nature of subdivision (c)(1) of this section and that no authority required an intervention before a person could pursue a petition for guardianship.Peeler v. Ark. Dep't of Human Servs., 2016 Ark. App. 534 (2016).

In an action brought by a divorced mother against a probate judge for damages for emotional distress suffered when she was temporarily denied custody of her minor son pursuant to an order issued by the probate judge, where the divorced mother failed to show a clear absence of the judge's jurisdiction to issue a custody order, the doctrine of judicial immunity was applicable and the action against the judge was properly dismissed. Harley v. Oliver, 539 F.2d 1143 (8th Cir. 1976) (decision under prior law).

In a proceeding for the appointment of a guardian, the question of whether children were neglected by the failure of their parents to permit vaccination so as to enable the children to attend school was properly before the probate court, as it had exclusive jurisdiction in matters of guardianship and was to try all issues of law and of facts arising in the proceedings within its jurisdiction. Cude v. State, 237 Ark. 927, 377 S.W.2d 816 (1964) (decision under prior law).

The probate court has exclusive jurisdiction over the payment of claims against a ward's account; therefore, the circuit court was in error in ordering payment. While appellee acted properly in filing and establishing its foreign judgment in circuit court, it then was required to file its claim in the probate court to receive payment. Forehand v. American Collection Serv., Inc., 307 Ark. 342, 819 S.W.2d 282 (1991) (decision under prior law).

Compensation of a guardian could be allowed on final settlement. France v. Shockey, 92 Ark. 41, 121 S.W. 1056 (1909) (decision under prior law).

A coguardian of an incompetent ward could retain counsel without court authorization, and such counsel was entitled to reasonable attorney fees set by the probate court for services rendered for the estate of the ward despite the other coguardian's objection that the counsel was representing the coguardian personally where the objecting coguardian had a conflict of interest with the estate of the ward. Jones v. Barnett, 236 Ark. 117, 365 S.W.2d 241 (1963) (decision under prior law).

Where a guardian employed a broker to sell a ward's realty, the sale was upon the order and approval of a probate court, and the services were beneficial to the ward's estate, the ward's estate was liable for a commission since the guardian had a right to employ the services of a competent real estate agent to assist in the sale of the ward's property. Gordon v. Burns, 203 Ark. 13, 155 S.W.2d 588 (1941) (decision under prior law).

On removal, a guardian could not claim a commission on an amount paid over on final settlement. Beakley v. Cunningham, 121 Ark. 457, 181 S.W. 287 (1915) (decision under prior law).

Where the assets of a ward's estate totaled over $200,000 and the yearly income exceeded $18,000, an award to the guardian of a fee of $1,377.75 for 14 months services in which guardian had appeared in more than 30 hearings would be justified. Omohundro v. Patty, 230 Ark. 252, 321 S.W.2d 746 (1959) (decision under prior law).

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 2; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-821; Acts 2017, No. 667, § 3.

28-65-107. Jurisdiction of courts.

The jurisdiction of the circuit court over all matters of guardianship, other than guardianships ad litem in other courts, shall be exclusive, subject to the right of appeal.

The provisions of this chapter shall not affect the jurisdiction of any court authorized to remove disabilities of minority.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 5; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-824; Acts 2001, No. 1029, § 2; 2003, No. 1185, § 279; 2009, No. 301, § 1; 2011, No. 159, § 3; 2013, No. 577, § 3.

28-65-108. Compensation of guardian.

A guardian shall be allowed such compensation for his or her services as guardian as the court shall deem just and reasonable.

If the court finds that the guardian has failed to discharge his or her duties as such in any respect, it may deny him or her any compensation whatsoever or may reduce the compensation which would otherwise be allowed.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 42; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-861.

28-65-109. Actions by ward against guardian.

An action by a ward against his or her guardian for a settlement of his or her accounts, for additional security, or for his or her removal, must be brought in the county in which the guardian was qualified.

History.

Acts 1985, No. 940, § 44; A.S.A. 1947, § 57-863.